North Carolina statutes. Chapter 142. State Debt.
Article 9. State Capital Facilities Finance Act.

§ 142-80.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the State Capital Facilities Finance Act.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

Repair and Renovation.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.1, provides: “This section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in a maximum aggregate principal amount of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) to be used only in accordance with this section for the repair and renovation of State facilities and related infrastructure that are supported from the General Fund.

“Proceeds of the Repair and Renovation special indebtedness shall be used only for the purposes and in accordance with the procedures provided in G.S. 143-15.3A, the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account.

“Except in the case of an emergency as provided in G.S. 143-15.3A, the Director of the Budget shall use the Repair and Renovations funds only for repairs and renovations that have been approved by an act of the General Assembly or, if the General Assembly is not in session, for repairs and renovations about which the Director of the Budget has first consulted with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations under G.S. 143-15.3A(c). The Director of the Budget shall direct the State Treasurer to carry out the financing for repair and renovation projects selected pursuant to this section. Special indebtedness authorized by this section shall be issued or incurred only in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, as enacted by this part.”

Session Laws 2003-314, ss. 2.1 through 2.3, provide: “Construction of Psychiatric Hospital. — In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, as enacted by this act, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of financing contract indebtedness in a maximum aggregate principal amount of one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000) to finance the cost of the project described in this Part, subject to the limitations described in this Part. The financing contract indebtedness shall not be incurred prior to July 1, 2004.

“The Project. — The project shall consist of the acquisition, construction, and equipping of an approximately 450,000 square foot, 432-bed new psychiatric hospital to be located in Butner.

“Authorization of Financing Contracts. — The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 10 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes as enacted by this act, is authorized to execute and deliver one or more financing contracts in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the cost of the project, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000). The State Treasurer may, in the Treasurer’s sole discretion, require one or more reports satisfactory to the Treasurer evidencing the savings expected to be realized from the closure of existing psychiatric hospitals that are to be replaced by the project and the feasibility of the financing of the project.”

Session Laws, 2003-314, s. 3.1, provides: “The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall maintain all existing educational and research programs in psychiatry and psychology conducted at Dorothea Dix Hospital and John Umstead Hospital by the University of North Carolina School of Medicine and by the Psychology Department within the College of Arts and Sciences at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, unless the programs are otherwise modified by the University of North Carolina School of Medicine or the College of Arts and Sciences. The University of North Carolina School of Medicine shall retain authority over all educational and research programs in psychiatry and the University of North Carolina College of Arts and Sciences shall retain authority over all educational and research programs in psychology conducted at these hospitals and at any new State psychiatric hospital. The Secretary shall consult with the University of North Carolina School of Medicine in programmatic, operational, and facility planning of the new psychiatric hospital to ensure appropriate patient treatment and continuation of educational and research programs conducted by the University of North Carolina School of Medicine. In addition, the Secretary shall consult with the University of North Carolina College of Arts and Sciences to ensure appropriate continuation of educational and research programs conducted by the University of North Carolina College of Arts and Sciences.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.4(a), provides: “This part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] provides an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized by this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. Except where expressly provided, this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing. The authority granted in this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] is in addition to other laws now or hereinafter enacted authorizing the State to issue or incur indebtedness.” Session Laws 2003-314, s. 4.1 contains similar provisions.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.4(b), provides: “References in this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] to specific sections or Chapters of the General Statutes are intended to be references to those sections or Chapters as they may be amended from time to time by the General Assembly.” Session Laws 2003-314, s. 4.1 contains similar provisions.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.4(c), provides: “This part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284], being necessary for the health and welfare of the people of the State, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.” Session Laws 2003-314, s. 4.1 contains similar provisions.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.4(d), provides: “If any provision of this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part [Part XLVI of Session Laws 2003-284] are severable.” Session Laws 2003-314, s. 4.1 contains similar provisions.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 48.1, provides: “Parts 32 through 47 of this act do not affect the rights or liabilities of the State, a taxpayer, or another person arising under a statute amended or repealed by those parts before the effective date of its amendment or repeal; nor do they affect the right to any refund or credit of a tax that accrued under the amended or repealed statute before the effective date of its amendment [June 30, 2003] or repeal.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2003.’ ”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 79, amended the lead-in language to Session Laws 2003-314, which enacted this Article, as amended by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 46.2.

Session Laws 2006-231, s. 4, effective August 10, 2006, provides: “In accordance with

G.S. 142-83

, this section authorizes the issuance or incurrence of special indebtedness in the maximum aggregate principal amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of a new parking deck to be constructed in downtown Raleigh. The State, with the prior approval of the State Treasurer and the Council of State, as provided in Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, is authorized to issue or incur special indebtedness in order to provide funds to the State to be used, together with other available funds, to pay the capital facility costs of the project described in this section.”

§ 142-81.
Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds as follows:

There is a continuing need for capital facilities for the State, many of which will continue to be provided on a “pay-as-you-go” basis by direct appropriations.

The State will also continue to provide capital facilities through the issuance of general obligation bonds.

There is a need, however, for the use of alternative financing methods, such as authorized in this Article, to facilitate the providing of capital facilities when circumstances and conditions warrant the providing of capital facilities through financing methods in addition to direct appropriations and the issuance of general obligation bonds.

The use of these alternative financing methods as authorized in this Article will provide financing flexibility to the State and permit the State to take advantage of changing financial and economic environments.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-82.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Bonded indebtedness. — Limited obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes, including refunding bonds and notes, authorized to be issued under this Article.

Bonds or notes. — Limited obligation bonds and notes authorized to be issued under this Article.

(2a)

(Expires December 31, 2028 — see note)

Build NC Bonds. — Special indebtedness issued to finance Build NC Projects, with the Build NC Net Proceeds of such special indebtedness used in accordance with both of the following requirements, measured in the aggregate for all issues:

Within two percent (2%) of fifty percent (50%) of the Build NC Net Proceeds during such period used for Division Need Projects in accordance with the requirements of Article 14B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

The remainder of the Build NC Net Proceeds during such period used for Regional Impact Projects in accordance with the requirements of Article 14B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

(2b)

(Expires December 31, 2028 — see note)

Build NC Net Proceeds. — The proceeds of an issue of Build NC Bonds net of deposits for the costs described in sub-subdivisions d., e., and f. of subdivision (6) of this section.

(2c)

(Expires December 31, 2028 — see note)

Build NC Project. — A capital facility identified and selected for financing with Build NC Bonds under this Article by the process set forth in Article 14B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

Capital facility. — Any one or more of the following:

Any one or more buildings, utilities, structures, or other facilities or property developments, including streets and landscaping, and the acquisition of equipment, machinery, and furnishings in connection with these items.

Additions, extensions, enlargements, renovations, and improvements to existing buildings, utilities, structures, or other facilities or property developments, including streets and landscaping.

Land or an interest in land.

Other infrastructure.

Furniture, fixtures, equipment, vehicles, machinery, and similar items.

Certificates of participation. — Certificates or other instruments delivered by a special corporation evidencing the assignment of proportionate undivided interests in rights to receive payments pursuant to a financing contract.

Certificates of participation indebtedness. — Financing contract indebtedness incurred by the State under a plan of finance in which a special corporation obtains funds to pay the cost of a capital facility to be financed through the delivery by the special corporation of certificates of participation.

Cost. — Any of the following in financing the cost of capital facilities as authorized by this Article:

The cost of constructing, reconstructing, renovating, repairing, enlarging, acquiring, and improving capital facilities, including the acquisition of land, rights-of-way, easements, franchises, equipment, machinery, furnishings, and other interests in real or personal property acquired or used in connection with a capital facility.

The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services.

The cost of providing personnel to ensure effective management of capital facilities.

Finance charges, reserves for debt service, and other types of reserves required pursuant to the terms of any special indebtedness or related documents, interest before and during construction or acquisition of a capital facility and, if considered advisable by the State Treasurer, for a period not exceeding two years after the estimated date of completion of construction or acquisition.

Administrative expenses and charges.

The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement facilities and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements or other derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs of the incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness.

The cost of reimbursing the State, a State agency, or a special corporation for any payments made for any cost described in this subdivision.

Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes of this Article.

Credit facility. — An agreement that:

Is entered into by the State with a bank, savings and loan association, or other banking institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company, or other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banking firm, or other investment institution, or any financial institution or other similar provider of a credit facility, which provider may be located within or without the United States of America; and

Provides for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest with respect to any special indebtedness payable on demand or tender by the owner in consideration of the State’s agreeing to repay the provider of the credit facility in accordance with the terms and provisions of the agreement.

Department of Administration. — The North Carolina Department of Administration, created by Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or, if the Department is abolished or otherwise divested of its functions under this Article, the public body succeeding it in its principal functions or upon which are conferred by law the rights, powers, and duties given by this Article to the Department.

Financing contract. — A contract entered into pursuant to this Article to finance capital facilities and constituting a lease-purchase contract, installment-purchase contract, or other similar type installment financing contract. The term does not include, however, a contract that meets any one of the following conditions:

It constitutes an operating lease under generally accepted accounting principles.

It provides for the payment under the contract over its full term, including periods that may be added to the original term through the exercise of options to renew or extend, of an aggregate principal amount of not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or any greater amount that may be established by the Council of State if the Council of State determines (i) the aggregate amount to be paid under these contracts will not have a significant impact on the State budgetary process or the economy of the State and (ii) the change will lessen the administrative burden on the State.

It is executed and provides for the making of all payments under the contract, including payment to be made during any period that may be added to the original term through the exercise of options to renew or extend, in the same fiscal year.

Financing contract indebtedness. — Indebtedness incurred pursuant to a financing contract, including certificates of participation indebtedness.

Fiscal period. — A fiscal biennium or a fiscal year of the fiscal biennium.

Fiscal year. — The fiscal year of the State beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the next calendar year.

Limited obligation bond. — A limited obligation bond issued pursuant to

G.S. 142-88

and payable and secured as provided in

G.S. 142-89

.

Par formula. — A provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne or provided for by any special indebtedness, including any of the following:

A provision providing for an adjustment so that the purchase price of special indebtedness in the open market would be as close to par as possible.

A provision providing for an adjustment based upon a percentage or percentages of a prime rate or base rate, which percentages may vary or be applied for different periods of time.

Any provision that the State Treasurer determines is consistent with this Article and will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of special indebtedness at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

Person. — An individual, a firm, a partnership, an association, a corporation, a limited liability company, or any other organization or group acting as a unit.

Special corporation. — Either of the following:

A nonprofit corporation created under Chapter 55A of the General Statutes for the purpose of facilitating the incurrence of certificates of participation indebtedness by the State under this Article.

A private corporation or other entity issuing certificates of participation pursuant to this Article.

Special indebtedness. — Financing contract indebtedness and bonded indebtedness issued or incurred pursuant to this Article.

State. — The State of North Carolina, including any State agency.

State agency. — Any agency, institution, board, commission, bureau, council, department, division, officer, or employee of the State. The term does not include counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, local boards of education, or other local public bodies.

State Treasurer. — The incumbent Treasurer, from time to time, of the State.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79; 2018-16, s. 3.

Build NC Bond Act of 2018.

Session Laws 2018-16, ss. 1, 2, provides: “(1) Short Title. — This act shall be known as the “Build NC Bond Act of 2018.

“(2) Legislative Intent. — The intent of the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 is to maintain the integrity of the Strategic Transportation Investments Act (STI). Toward this end and consistent with STI:

“(1) The bond proceeds shall not be treated as revenue.

“(2) Debt service is subject to the distribution formula in G.S. 136-189.11.

“(3) Funds distributed under the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 to be used for the Regional Impact Projects tier shall be allocated within two percent (2%) by population of Distribution Regions based on the most recent estimates certified by the Office of State Budget and Management and used for Regional Impact Projects pursuant to the criteria in G.S. 136-189.11(d)(2)a.

“(4) Funds distributed under the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 to be used for the Division Need Projects tier shall be allocated within two percent (2%) of an equal share to each of the Department divisions, as defined in G.S. 136-14.1, and used for Division Need Projects pursuant to the criteria in G.S. 136-189.11(d)(3)a.

“(5) The formula variance in G.S. 136-189.11(e) shall only apply to the debt service.

“(6) Nothing in the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 prevents the issuance of other bonds or special indebtedness for highway or transportation purposes under Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 6, provides: “The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, shall develop and implement a debt management policy to guide the Department’s practices in regards to issuing Build NC Bonds, as defined in

G.S. 142-82(2a)

, as enacted by Section 3 of this act. By July 1, 2019, the State Treasurer shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee detailing the debt management plan developed in accordance with this section.”

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 7, provides, in part, that subdivisions (2a), (2b), and (2c), as added by Session Laws 2018-16, s. 3, expire December 31, 2028.

Session Laws 2020-91, s. 4.3(b), provides: “Notwithstanding the project tier distribution requirements in subdivision (2a) of

G.S. 142-82

and Section 2 of S.L. 2018-16, the Department of Transportation shall use the net proceeds of Build NC Bonds issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section on currently existing projects.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 3, effective January 1, 2019, added subdivisions (2a), (2b), and (2c). For expiration of subdivisions, see editor’s note.